Massachusetts, session 194th, H1011.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2A of Chapter 131 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the section in its entirety and inserting in place
thereof the following:-
Section 2A. There is hereby established within the Inland Fisheries and Game Fund, a
wildland acquisition account which shall be credited monies received from the sale of wildland
conservation stamps, the portion of the fees for sporting, fishing, trapping and hunting licenses to
be credited under the provisions of section 2C, contributions thereto and any grant monies from
the federal government or other public and private sources.
of 3

Said account, subject to appropriation, shall be used only for the purchase of land
containing wildlife habitat and for costs directly related to the administration of the wildlands
stamp program.
Two dollars and fifty cents from the sale of wildlands conservation stamp shall be
dedicated to habitat management on lands managed by the division of fisheries and wildlife.
The director may contract with the seller of wildlands for installment payments provided
that the total of all such installment payments does not exceed seventy-five percent of the
previous year's income to the wildlands acquisition account. Acquisition of all lands so
purchased shall be made with the advice and consent of the fisheries and wildlife board. All such
lands shall be acquired exclusively for protection and management of wildlife habitat and shall
be available for fishing, trapping, and hunting.
SECTION 2. Section 13A of Chapter 131 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as
appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the section in its entirety
and inserting in place thereof the following:-
Section 13A. Except as hereinafter provided, no person shall fish, trap, or hunt in the
commonwealth, or utilize any lands managed by the division of fisheries and wildlife without
first having obtained a wildlands conservation stamp, which shall be issued by the director or his
duly authorized agent upon the payment of seven dollars and fifty cents; provided, however, that
persons who are exempted from licensing requirements need not purchase such a stamp;
provided, further, that persons issued fishing, sporting, trapping, or hunting licenses without
charge shall be issued said stamp without charge; and provided, further, that no person who has
purchased a stamp with any current resident license to fish, trap, or hunt shall be required to pay
of 3

the fee for a wildlands conservation stamp for any additional current license or any duplicate
license. The director is hereby authorized to issue stamps in such form as he may prescribe and
may issue rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this section. The stamp may
be imprinted directly on fishing, sporting, trapping, or hunting licenses or issued separately at the
discretion of the director.
of 3